Hawaii statutes.
§612-12 Master jury wheel. Each year
the clerk for each circuit, by random selection, shall place in the master jury
wheel the names of prospective jurors taken from the master list, in such
number as the clerk determines should be processed in order to provide the
number of jurors required for the ensuing year. From time to time an
additional number may be determined by the clerk or ordered by the court to be
placed in the master jury wheel. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 366,
§5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next